tables/lt-lt-g1.utb
# Lithuanian Uncontracted Braille Table
# by Mike Sivill <mike.sivill@viewplus.com>

include text_nabcc.dis
include eurodefs.cti

# Space Chars
space \t 0 tab
space \x000A 0
space \x000D 0
space \s 0

# Braille Indicators
capsign 46
begcaps 46
endcaps 6
numsign 3456

# Other symbols and punctuation 
always & 12346 
always = 2356 
always ( 2356 
always ! 235 
always ) 2356 
always * 35 
always < 246 
always % 123456 
always ? 26 
always : 25 
always $ 46 
always ] 23456 
always \\ 34
always [ 12356 
always / 34 
always + 235 
always # 3456 
always > 135 
always ` 4 
always ~ 356
always ' 3 
sign | 56 
always - 36 
always @ 1246 
always ^ 45
always _ 456
prepunc " 236 
postpunc " 356 
always . 256 
always ; 23 
always , 2 
always { 246 
always } 135 

# Numbers
litdigit 1 1
litdigit 2 12
litdigit 3 14
litdigit 4 145
litdigit 5 15
litdigit 6 124
litdigit 7 1245
litdigit 8 125
litdigit 9 24
litdigit 0 245

# Latin Alphabet
uplow Aa 1 
uplow Bb 12 
uplow Cc 14 
uplow Dd 145 
uplow Ee 15 
uplow Ff 124 
uplow Gg 1245 
uplow Hh 125 
uplow Ii 24 
uplow Jj 245 
uplow Kk 13
uplow Ll 123 
uplow Mm 134 
uplow Nn 1345 
uplow Oo 135 
uplow Pp 1234 
uplow Qq 12345
uplow Rr 1235 
uplow Ss 234 
uplow Tt 2345 
uplow Uu 136 
uplow Vv 1236 
uplow Ww 2456 
uplow Xx 1346 
uplow Yy 13456 
uplow Zz 1356 

# German accented chars
uplow \x00DC\x00FC 1256 	# U umlaut
uplow \x00D6\x00F6 246 	# O umlaut
uplow \x00C4\x00E4 345 

# Lithuanian special alphabet letters
uplow \x0104\x0105 16 	# A with grave
uplow \x010C\x010D 146 	# E with grave
uplow \x0118\x0119 156 	# AE
uplow \x0116\x0117 345 	# E umlaut
uplow \x012E\x012F 246 	# A with acute
uplow \x0160\x0161 2346	# Eth
uplow \x0172\x0173 346 	# ) with stroke, slashed O
uplow \x016A\x016B 1256 	# U with circumflex
uplow \x017D\x017E 126 	# Thorn

# Lithuanian special alphabet letters
uplow \x00C0\x00E0 16 	# A with grave
uplow \x00C8\x00E8 146 	# E with grave
uplow \x00C6\x00E6 156 	# AE
uplow \x00CB\x00EB 345 	# E umlaut
uplow \x00C1\x00E1 246 	# A with acute
uplow \x00D0\x00F0 2346	# Eth
uplow \x00D8\x00F8 346 	# ) with stroke, slashed O
uplow \x00DB\x00FB 1256 	# U with circumflex
uplow \x00DE\x00FE 126 	# Thorn
